Utah statutes.
31A-12-103.   Rates charged to school districts.
The rates charged to school districts for policies issued under Section
63A-4-204 are not subject to Chapter 19a, except for the filing requirement of
Subsection 31A-19a-203(1) and the public availability requirement of Section
31A-19a-204.  Rate filing fees under Section 31A-3-103 shall be paid to the
department by the Risk Management Fund.
